Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.210

Process servers—Registration—Fees.

(1) Each county auditor shall develop a registration process to register process servers required to register under RCW 18.180.010.

(2) The county auditor may collect an annual registration fee from the process server not to exceed ten dollars.

(3) The county auditor shall use a form in the registration process for the purpose of identifying and locating the registrant, including the process server's name, birthdate, and social security number, and the process server's business name, business address, and business telephone number.

(4) The county auditor shall maintain a register of process servers and assign a number to each registrant. Upon renewal of the registration as required in RCW 18.180.020, the auditor shall continue to assign the same registration number. A successor entity composed of one or more registrants shall be permitted to transfer one or more registration numbers to the new entity.

[ 1997 c 41 s 8; 1992 c 125 s 2.]

NOTES:

Construction—1992 c 125: See RCW 18.180.900.